Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0023.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 108. (1) A division is not subject to the platting requirements of this act. (2) Subject to subsection (3), the division, together with any previous divisions of the same parent parcel or parent tract, shall result in a number of parcels not more than the sum of the following, as applicable: (a) For the first 10 acres or fraction thereof in the parent parcel or parent tract, the following number of parcels: (i) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added subsection (6), until 1 year after that date, and subject to subsection (6), 4 parcels. (ii) Beginning 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added subsection (6), 10 parcels. (b) For each whole 10 acres in excess of the first 10 acres in the parent parcel or parent tract, 1 additional parcel, for up to a maximum of 11 additional parcels. (c) For each whole 40 acres in excess of the first 120 acres in the parent parcel or parent tract, 1 additional parcel. (3) For a parent parcel or parent tract of not less than 20 acres, the division may result in a total of 2 parcels in addition to those permitted by subsection (2) if 1 or both of the following apply: (a) Because of the establishment of 1 or more new roads, no new driveway accesses to an existing public road for any of the resulting parcels under subsection (2) or this subsection are created or required. (b) One of the resulting parcels under subsection (2) and this subsection comprises not less than 60% of the area of the parent parcel or parent tract. (4) A parcel of 40 acres or more created by the division of a parent parcel or parent tract shall not be counted toward the number of parcels permitted under subsections (2) and (3) and is not subject to section 109, if the parcel is accessible. (5) A parcel or tract created by an exempt split or a division is not a new parent parcel or parent tract and may be further partitioned or split without being subject to the platting requirements of this act if all of the following requirements are met: (a) Not less than 10 years have elapsed since the parcel or tract was recorded. (b) The partitioning or splitting results in not more than the following number of parcels, whichever is less: (i) Two parcels for the first 10 acres or fraction thereof in the parcel or tract plus 1 additional parcel for each whole 10 acres in excess of the first 10 acres in the parcel or tract. (ii) Seven parcels or 10 parcels if one of the resulting parcels under this subsection comprises not less than 60% of the area of the parcel or tract being partitioned or split. (c) The partitioning or splitting satisfies the requirements of section 109. (6) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, a parcel or tract may be partitioned or split at any time into a greater number of parcels or tracts than otherwise authorized by this section if the partitioning or splitting is authorized by and complies with standards set forth in an ordinance of the municipality or county having authority to approve or disapprove a division under section 109(1). (7) A parcel or tract created under the provisions of subsection (5) or of an ordinance described in subsection (6) may not be further partitioned or split without being subject to the platting requirements of this act, except in accordance with the provisions of subsection (5) or of an ordinance described in subsection (6). Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor